Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2403
Contract or amendment; filing with
State Department of Education; public posting.

After approval of a contract, or
any amendments thereto, for superintendent services or educational service
unit administrator services, the approving board shall file a copy of such
contract or amendment with the State Department of Education on or before
the next succeeding August 1. The department shall have no duty to review
such contracts or amendments but shall publicly post all such contracts or
amendments received on the website of the department.

Laws 2014, LB470, § 4.